Utah statutes.
54-8-25.   Utilities responsible for work -- May subcontract -- Title to converted facilities retained.

(1)  The utility concerned:

(a)   shall be responsible for the accomplishment of all construction work to the point of delivery; and

(b)  may contract out any part of the construction work as it considers desirable.

(2)  Title to the converted facilities shall be at all times solely and exclusively vested in the public utility corporations involved.

(3)  The public body, improvement district, or the public generally will not own the facilities at any time and the public is purchasing only the intangible benefits which come from converted facilities, that is the removal of the overhead facilities and replacement by underground facilities.

